Maryland, session 2026, SB0386.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–103.
(a) An electric company incorporated in Maryland may:
(1) manufacture, sell, and furnish electric power in any municipal
corporation or county of the State;
(2) construct a power line to transmit power under, along, on, or over the
roadways or public ways of any municipal corporation or county of the State; and
(3) connect the power line from the place of supply to any other structure
or object.
(b) (1) An electric company must have the consent of the governing body of the
municipal corporation or county before laying or constructing any power line in accordance
with subsection (a) of this section.
(2) The governing body of the municipal corporation or county may adopt
reasonable regulations and conditions for the laying of a power line, including regulations
requiring the electric company to refill and repave any roadway or public way under which
the power line is laid.
(C) AN ELECTRIC COMPANY THAT OWNS OR OPERATES A TRANSMISSION
LINE THAT IS DESIGNED TO CARRY A VOLTAGE IN EXCESS OF 69,000 VOLTS AND IS
LOCATED IN THE STATE SHALL PARTICIPATE AS A MEMBER IN A REGIONAL
TRANSMISSION ORGANIZATION.
7–207.
(b) (3) (i) Except as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection, unless a
certificate of public convenience and necessity for the construction is first obtained from the
Commission, a person may not begin construction of an overhead transmission line that is
designed to carry a voltage in excess of 69,000 volts or exercise a right of condemnation
with the construction.
(ii) For construction related to an existing overhead transmission
line, the Commission may waive the requirement in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph for
good cause.
(iii) Notwithstanding subparagraph (i) of this paragraph and subject
to subparagraph [(iv)] (V) of this paragraph, the Commission may issue a certificate of
public convenience and necessity for the construction of an overhead transmission line only

SENATE BILL 386
if the applicant for the certificate of public convenience and necessity:
1. is an electric company; or
2. is or, on the start of commercial operation of the overhead
transmission line, will be subject to regulation as a public utility by an officer or an agency
of the United States.
(iv) A PERSON APPLYING FOR A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC
CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY FOR THE CONSTRUCTION OF A TRANSMISSION LINE
SHALL INCLUDE WITH THE APPLICATION:
1. AT LEAST ONE ALTERNATIVE PROPOSAL THAT USES
ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES, AS DEFINED IN § 7–805 OF THIS TITLE,
IN WHOLE OR IN PART, TO ADDRESS THE SAME NEED MORE EFFICIENTLY OR
COST–EFFECTIVELY THAN THE PRIMARY PROPOSED PROJECT; AND
2. AS DIRECTED BY THE COMMISSION, A DETAILED,
WRITTEN EXPLANATION COMPARING THE COST–EFFECTIVENESS, TECHNICAL
FEASIBILITY, AND SYSTEM BENEFITS OF EACH ALTERNATIVE PROPOSAL COMPARED
WITH THOSE OF THE PRIMARY PROPOSED PROJECT.
(V) The Commission may not issue a certificate of public convenience
and necessity for the construction of an overhead transmission line in the electric
distribution service territory of an electric company to an applicant other than an electric
company if:
1. the overhead transmission line is to be located solely
within the electric distribution service territory of that electric company; and
2. the cost of the overhead transmission line is to be paid
solely by that electric company and its ratepayers.
[(v)] (VI) 1. This subparagraph applies to the construction of an
overhead transmission line for which a certificate of public convenience and necessity is
required under this section.
2. On issuance of a certificate of public convenience and
necessity for the construction of an overhead transmission line, a person may acquire by
condemnation, in accordance with Title 12 of the Real Property Article, any property or
right necessary for the construction or maintenance of the transmission line.
(4) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, for
construction related to an existing overhead transmission line designed to carry a voltage
in excess of 69,000 volts, the Commission shall waive the requirement to obtain a certificate
of public convenience and necessity if the Commission finds that the construction does not:

SENATE BILL 386 5
1. require the person to obtain new real property or
additional rights–of–way through eminent domain; or
2. require larger or higher structures to accommodate:
A. increased voltage; or
B. larger conductors.
(ii) 1. For construction related to an existing overhead
transmission line, including repairs, that is necessary to avoid an imminent safety hazard
or reliability risk, a person may undertake the necessary construction.
2. Within 30 days after construction is completed under
subsubparagraph 1 of this subparagraph, a person shall file a report with the Commission
describing the work that was completed.
7–805.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ADVANCED POWER FLOW CONTROL” MEANS TECHNOLOGIES
THAT MODULATE CIRCUIT IMPEDANCE OR OTHER ELECTRICAL PROPERTIES TO
REROUTE POWER FLOWS TO TRANSMISSION LINES WITH AVAILABLE CAPACITY.
(3) “ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGY” MEANS:
(I) GRID–ENHANCING TECHNOLOGIES; AND
(II) HIGH–PERFORMANCE CONDUCTORS.
(4) “DYNAMIC LINE RATING” MEANS A SYSTEM THAT USES
REAL–TIME OR FORECAST WEATHER AND OPERATING CONDITIONS, INCLUDING
WIND SPEED AND DIRECTION, TO DETERMINE THE MAXIMUM CAPACITY OF A
TRANSMISSION LINE.
(5) “GRID–ENHANCING TECHNOLOGY” MEANS HARDWARE OR
SOFTWARE THAT INCREASES THE CAPACITY, EFFICIENCY, OR RELIABILITY OF
EXISTING DISTRIBUTION OR TRANSMISSION LINES, INCLUDING:
(I) DYNAMIC LINE RATINGS;
(II) ADVANCED POWER FLOW CONTROL; AND

SENATE BILL 386
(III) TOPOLOGY OPTIMIZATION.
(6) “HIGH PERFORMANCE CONDUCTORS” MEANS CONDUCTORS,
INCLUDING CARBON FIBER OR COMPOSITE CORE CONDUCTORS AND
SUPERCONDUCTORS, THAT, COMPARED TO TRADITIONAL ALUMINUM–CONDUCTOR
STEEL–REINFORCED CONDUCTORS:
(I) HAVE A SIMILAR DIAMETER AND WEIGHT; AND
(II) 1. HAVE A DIRECT CURRENT ELECTRICAL RESISTANCE
THAT IS AT LEAST 10% LESS;
2. INCREASE THE POTENTIAL ENERGY CARRYING
CAPACITY BY AT LEAST 75%; OR
3. HAVE A COEFFICIENT OF THERMAL EXPANSION THAT
IS AT LEAST 30% LESS.
(7) “TOPOLOGY OPTIMIZATION” MEANS SOFTWARE THAT IDENTIFIES
SWITCHING CONFIGURATIONS TO REROUTE ELECTRICITY AND ALLEVIATE
TRANSMISSION CONSTRAINTS.
(8) “TRANSMISSION UTILITY” MEANS AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A
TRANSMISSION LINE THAT IS DESIGNED TO CARRY A VOLTAGE IN EXCESS OF 69,000
VOLTS AND IS LOCATED IN THE STATE.
(B) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, AND JULY 1 EVERY 3 YEARS THEREAFTER,
EACH TRANSMISSION UTILITY SHALL SUBMIT TO THE COMMISSION AN ADVANCED
TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGY IMPLEMENTATION REPORT THAT IS PREPARED BY A
THIRD PARTY SELECTED BY THE COMMISSION.
(C) THE REPORT SHALL:
(1) EVALUATE THE POTENTIAL USE OF AND INVESTMENT IN
ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES BY THE TRANSMISSION UTILITY OVER
THE NEXT 5 YEARS AND ASSESS HOW THESE TECHNOLOGIES COULD BE DEPLOYED
AT ONE OR MORE OF THE TRANSMISSION UTILITY’S TRANSMISSION LINES IN THE
STATE TO ENHANCE THE SAFETY, RELIABILITY, EFFICIENCY, OR
COST–EFFECTIVENESS OF THE DISTRIBUTION OR TRANSMISSION SYSTEM;
(2) EXPLAIN HOW THE DEPLOYMENT OF ADVANCED TRANSMISSION
TECHNOLOGIES WOULD ACHIEVE:

SENATE BILL 386 7
(I) REDUCED COSTS;
(II) INCREASED TRANSMISSION CAPACITY;
(III) REDUCED TRANSMISSION CONGESTION;
(IV) ENHANCED ADOPTION OF OR REDUCED CURTAILMENT OF
RENEWABLE RESOURCES;
(V) INCREASED RELIABILITY; AND
(VI) INCREASED CAPACITY FOR THE CONNECTION OF NEW
GENERATION RESOURCES, FOCUSING ON RESOURCES NEEDED TO MEET THE
STATE’S RENEWABLE ENERGY PORTFOLIO STANDARD GOALS;
(3) IDENTIFY ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES THAT WERE
CONSIDERED BUT NOT SELECTED WHEN EVALUATING THE TRANSMISSION
ENHANCEMENTS PLANNED TO MEET IDENTIFIED TRANSMISSION NEEDS FOR THE
SUBSEQUENT 5 YEARS AND THE REASONS THOSE ADVANCED TRANSMISSION
TECHNOLOGIES WERE NOT SELECTED;
(4) INCLUDE A BENEFIT AND COST EVALUATION COMPARING
TRADITIONAL TRANSMISSION INVESTMENTS WITH ADVANCED TRANSMISSION
TECHNOLOGIES FOR ALL PROJECTS CONSIDERED; AND
(5) DESCRIBE THE CURRENT LINE RATING METHODOLOGY USED,
INCLUDING ANY RELIANCE ON STATIC RATINGS OR SEASONAL ASSUMPTIONS.
(D) THE COMMISSION MAY DEVELOP PERFORMANCE–BASED INCENTIVES
FOR THE DEPLOYMENT AND OPERATION OF ADVANCED TRANSMISSION
TECHNOLOGIES, INCLUDING:
(1) EARNINGS ADJUSTMENT MECHANISMS;
(2) ACCELERATED COST RECOVERY; AND
(3) SHARED SAVINGS MECHANISMS.
Article – State Government
9–2018.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PROGRAM” MEANS THE SOLAR AND ENERGY

SENATE BILL 386
STORAGE MARKET STABILIZATION PROGRAM.
(B) THERE IS A SOLAR AND ENERGY STORAGE MARKET STABILIZATION
PROGRAM IN THE ADMINISTRATION.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO PROVIDE FINANCIAL
ASSISTANCE IN THE FORM OF LOW–INTEREST AND ZERO–INTEREST LOANS OR
GRANTS TO STABILIZE AND BACKFILL INVESTMENT GAPS FOR CLEAN ENERGY
PROJECTS THAT FACE FINANCIAL UNCERTAINTY AS THE RESULT OF THE LOSS OF
FEDERAL TAX INCENTIVES.
(D) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL:
(1) COLLABORATE WITH THE APPROPRIATE UNITS OF STATE
GOVERNMENT IN THE DEVELOPMENT OF CRITERIA BY WHICH PROJECTS SHALL BE
EVALUATED UNDER THE PROGRAM;
(2) ISSUE A REQUEST FOR INFORMATION AND CONDUCT OTHER
OUTREACH AS NEEDED TO ASSIST IN THE DESIGN OF THE PROGRAM;
(3) ESTABLISH A PROCESS BY WHICH PROJECTS MAY APPLY FOR
FUNDING UNDER THE PROGRAM;
(4) ESTABLISH TERMS AND CONDITIONS FOR LOANS AND GRANTS
MADE UNDER THE PROGRAM; AND
(5) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2026, PUBLISH THE CRITERIA FOR
THE PROGRAM ON THE ADMINISTRATION’S WEBSITE AND INVITE APPLICATIONS
FOR THE PROGRAM.
(E) THE PROGRAM:
(1) SHALL PRIORITIZE PROJECTS THAT ARE THE MOST PREPARED TO
BEGIN CONSTRUCTION, ALSO KNOWN AS SHOVEL–READY PROJECTS;
(2) SHALL BE A PERFORMANCE–BASED INCENTIVE DETERMINED BY A
CLOSED BID SYSTEM IN WHICH THE PROJECTS THAT BID THE LOWEST DOLLAR PER
MEGAWATT OF CAPACITY ARE PROVIDED LOANS OR GRANTS FROM THE PROGRAM;
(3) MAY BE SEGMENTED TO INCENTIVIZE THE VARIOUS MARKET
SUBSETS OF SOLAR DEVELOPMENT, INCLUDING:
(I) COMMUNITY SOLAR PROJECTS;

SENATE BILL 386 9
(II) UTILITY SCALE PROJECTS, AS DEFINED BY THE
ADMINISTRATION; AND
(III) BROWNFIELD PROJECTS AND PARKING CANOPIES;
(4) SHALL PRIORITIZE PROJECTS THAT ARE EXPECTED TO BE
INTERCONNECTED AND OPERATIONAL WITHIN 3 YEARS AFTER THE DATE THE
APPLICATION IS RECEIVED; AND
(5) MAY GIVE PREFERENCE TO PROJECTS THAT INCORPORATE
ENERGY STORAGE TECHNOLOGIES.
(F) A LOAN OR GRANT PROVIDED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE FUNDED
THROUGH:
(1) FUNDS TRANSFERRED TO THE PROGRAM FROM THE MARYLAND
STRATEGIC ENERGY INVESTMENT FUND; AND
(2) ANY OTHER MONEY MADE AVAILABLE TO THE ADMINISTRATION
FOR THE PROGRAM.
9–20B–05.
(a) There is a Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Fund.
(f) The Administration shall use the Fund:
(13) notwithstanding subsection (g) of this section, to pay costs associated
with the Air and Radiation Administration within the Department of the Environment;
[and]
(14) TO PAY COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH THE SOLAR AND ENERGY
STORAGE MARKET STABILIZATION PROGRAM; AND
[(14)] (15) to pay the expenses of the Program.
(i) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2), (3), [and] (4), AND (5) of this
subsection, compliance fees paid under § 7–705(b) of the Public Utilities Article may be
used only to make loans and grants to support the creation of new Tier 1 renewable [energy]
sources, AS DEFINED IN § 7–701 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE, in the State that
are owned by or directly benefit:
(i) low– to moderate–income communities located in a census tract
with an average median income at or below 80% of the average median income for the State;

SENATE BILL 386
or
(ii) overburdened or underserved communities, as defined in § 1–701
of the Environment Article.
(2) Compliance fees paid under § 7–705(b)(2)(i)2 of the Public Utilities
Article shall be accounted for separately within the Fund and may be used only to make
loans and grants to support the creation of new solar energy sources in the State that are
owned by or directly benefit:
(i) low– to moderate–income communities located in a census tract
with an average median income at or below 80% of the average median income for the State;
(ii) overburdened or underserved communities, as defined in § 1–701
of the Environment Article; or
(iii) households with low to moderate income, as defined in § 9–2016
of this title.
(3) For fiscal year 2026 only, up to $100,000,000 of compliance fees paid
under §§ 7–705(b) and 7–705(b)(2)(i)2 of the Public Utilities Article shall be accounted for
separately within the Fund and may be used for solar development on State government
property and local government clean energy projects.
(4) (i) Subject to subparagraphs (ii), (iii), and (iv) of this paragraph,
compliance fees paid under § 7–705 of the Public Utilities Article may be used to provide
grants to electric companies to be refunded or credited to each residential distribution
customer based on the customer’s consumption of electricity supply that is subject to the
renewable energy portfolio standard.
(ii) The refunding or crediting of amounts to residential distribution
customers shall be identified on the customer’s bill as a line item identified as a “legislative
energy relief refund”.
(iii) An electric company awarded a grant under this paragraph:
1. may not retain any of the grant funds to cover overhead
expenses; and
2. shall provide all of the grant funds to residential
distribution customers.
(iv) The process under subparagraphs (i) and (ii) of this paragraph
related to the refunding or crediting of amounts to residential distribution customers shall
be directed and overseen by the Commission.
(5) FOR FISCAL YEARS 2027 THROUGH 2031, COMPLIANCE FEES PAID

SENATE BILL 386 11
UNDER § 7–705 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE AND DEPOSITED INTO THE
FUND MAY BE USED FOR GRANTS OR LOANS TO SUPPORT THE CREATION OF NEW
TIER 1 RENEWABLE SOURCES, AS DEFINED IN § 7–701 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES
ARTICLE, IN THE STATE.
Article – Transportation
8–311.
(A) THE SECRETARY SHALL DEVELOP:
(1) PROCESSES, INCLUDING A MODEL LEASING FRAMEWORK AND
SAFETY GUIDELINES, FOR ELECTRIC TRANSMISSION OR DISTRIBUTION LINES AND
BATTERY ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEMS TO BE LOCATED WITHIN EXISTING
RIGHTS–OF–WAY ALONG STATE AND INTERSTATE HIGHWAYS OR ON OTHER
PROPERTY UNDER THE CONTROL OF THE DEPARTMENT; AND
(2) AN EXPEDITED APPROVAL PROCESS FOR THE SITING OF
ELECTRIC TRANSMISSION AND DISTRIBUTION LINES AND BATTERY ENERGY
STORAGE SYSTEMS WITHIN EXISTING RIGHTS–OF–WAY OR ON OTHER PROPERTY
UNDER THE CONTROL OF THE DEPARTMENT.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE MARYLAND ENERGY
ADMINISTRATION, THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES, THE POWER
PLANT RESEARCH PROGRAM, AND THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE SHALL
CONDUCT A STUDY TO DETERMINE WHICH EXISTING RIGHTS–OF–WAY MAY BE
APPROPRIATE FOR THE SITING OF ELECTRIC TRANSMISSION OR DISTRIBUTION
LINES AND BATTERY ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEMS UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION.
(C) THE SECRETARY MAY APPROVE OR DISAPPROVE PROJECTS SUBMITTED
FOR APPROVAL UNDER THIS SECTION.
(D) A PROJECT APPROVED UNDER THIS SECTION IS SUBJECT TO THE
FOLLOWING CONDITIONS:
(1) THE PROJECT SHALL COMPLY WITH FEDERAL LAW;
(2) THE OWNER OF THE ELECTRIC TRANSMISSION OR DISTRIBUTION
LINE OR BATTERY ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEM BEING INSTALLED SHALL PAY:
(I) THE FAIR MARKET VALUE FOR THE USE AND OCCUPANCY OF
THE RIGHT–OF–WAY; AND

SENATE BILL 386
(II) TO THE STATE ALL ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS AND OTHER
APPLICABLE FEES;
(3) THE OWNER OF THE ELECTRIC TRANSMISSION OR DISTRIBUTION
LINE BEING INSTALLED:
(I) IS RESPONSIBLE FOR ALL INSTALLATION AND
MAINTENANCE COSTS; AND
(II) SHALL RELOCATE THE OWNER’S TRANSMISSION OR
DISTRIBUTION LINES AT THE OWNER’S EXPENSE AND IN AN EXPEDITED MANNER IF
RELOCATION IS NEEDED FOR ANY PUBLIC PURPOSE; AND
(4) ANY OTHER CONDITIONS SPECIFIED BY THE SECRETARY OR IN
REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(E) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2027, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT
REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–207.
(I) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGY”
HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 7–805 OF THIS TITLE.
(2) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B)(4) OF THIS SECTION,
THE COMMISSION SHALL ISSUE AN ORDER APPROVING OR DENYING A CERTIFICATE
OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY WITHIN 180 DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF A
COMPLETE APPLICATION FOR CONSTRUCTION TO:
(I) REPLACE THE CONDUCTOR, WIRE, OR ASSOCIATED LINE
STRUCTURES OF AN EXISTING TRANSMISSION OR DISTRIBUTION LINE; OR
(II) INSTALL ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES TO
EXPAND OR ENHANCE AN EXISTING TRANSMISSION OR DISTRIBUTION LINE.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Public Utilities

SENATE BILL 386 13
7–207.
(i) (1) In this subsection, “advanced transmission technology” has the
meaning stated in § 7–805 of this title.
(2) [Except as provided in subsection (b)(4) of this section, the] THE
Commission shall issue an order approving or denying a certificate of public convenience
and necessity within 180 days after receipt of a complete application for construction to:
(i) replace the conductor, wire, or associated line structures of an
existing transmission or distribution line; or
(ii) install advanced transmission technologies to expand or enhance
an existing transmission or distribution line.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, from the alternative
compliance fees paid into the Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Fund in accordance
with § 7–705 of the Public Utilities Article, a portion shall be used to provide grant awards
to electric companies, including electric cooperatives and municipal electric utilities, to be
refunded or credited to residential distribution customers for electric service in fiscal year
2027 in accordance with subsection (b) of this section.
(2) The Governor may transfer by budget amendment up to $100,000,000
of the funds described in paragraph (1) of this subsection to the Public Service Commission
to be awarded to electric companies, including electric cooperatives and municipal electric
utilities.
(b) The funds described in subsection (a) of this section shall be:
(1) distributed in accordance with § 9–20B–05(i)(4) of the State
Government Article; and
(2) refunded or credited to residential distribution customers one time
before a peak summer month but not later than October 31, 2026.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, notwithstanding any other
provision of law, the Governor may transfer by budget amendment up to $10,000,000 from
the Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Fund to fund the study required under § 8–311
of the Transportation Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 3 of this Act shall take
effect on the taking effect of the termination provision specified in Section 14 of Chapters
625 and 626 of the Acts of the General Assembly of 2025. If that termination provision takes
effect, Section 2 of this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall

SENATE BILL 386
be abrogated and of no further force and effect. This Act may not be interpreted to have any
effect on that termination provision.
SECTION 7. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to the provisions of
Section 6 of this Act, this Act shall take effect July 1, 2026.